Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 46-1201 to 46-1241 shall be known and may be cited as the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 38;

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1241, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 133, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1143.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.